District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.07

Increase.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 360, ch. 258, art. V, § 1
repealed pursuant to § 302 of D.C. Law 11-111
1981 Ed., § 43-1523.
1973 Ed., § 43-1520a.
Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 302 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.